Texas, session 891, HB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0093 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0093.  PROHIBITED CONSTRUCTION IN 100-YEAR FLOODPLAIN. (a) In this section, "100-year floodplain" means an area with a one percent or greater chance of inundation by a flood in any given year as designated in maps or other data from the Federal Emergency Management Agency or in soil maps from the United States Department of Agriculture. (b)  A youth camp operator may not construct an overnight accommodation at a resident youth camp in an area of the camp located within a 100-year floodplain. (c)  The executive commissioner may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  Section 141.0093, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act, applies only to the construction of a new overnight accommodation that begins on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.